DIAGNOSTICS - ACTIVEHEIGHT CONTROLSUSPENSION &

DI-243

SKYHOOK TEMS
DTC C1741 /41 AHC Motor Relay Circuit
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This relay is to supply power source to the pump & motor. The relay is stays ON while the height control is
operated.
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
After the condition that the upper reaches voltage of the motor
relay solenoidis 2V or less when motor relay is ON continued ¢ AHC motorrelay
C1741/ 41 for40 + 10msec.andwhenturningonthe electricity 1sec.| <AHCmotorrelaycircuit
later and detecting the short circuit condition 2 times continu- « Suspension control ECU
ously.

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the AHC motor relay circuit, the height control is prohibited after adjusting the vehicle to
the standard height in case that the height is higher than the standard or to the lowest wheel of the 4 wheels
in case that the height is lower than the standard.
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DIAGNOSTICS - ACTIVEHEIGHT CONTROL SUSPENSION & DI-245
SKYHOOK TEMS

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check AHC motor relay operation.

INCASEOFUSINGHAND -HELDTESTER:

PREPARATION:

(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

(b) Startthe engine and push the hand -heldtester main switch ON.

(c) Selectthe ACTIVETEST mode onthe hand -heldtester.

CHECK:

Checkthe operation sound ofthe AHC motor relay when operating it with the hand —heldtester.
OK:

The operation sound of the AHC motor relay should be heard.

Ts INCASEOFNOTUSINGHAND -HELDTESTER:
l-, PREPARATION:
[

|

(@ Using SST, connect terminals Ts and CG of DLCS3.
SST 09843 -18040
(b) Push the "]DOWN?” button of the height select switch 5
times or more within 5 seconds after starting the engine.
HINT:
At this time the height control OFF indicator light flashes at 0.25
rossco| Secondintervals.
CHECK:
Change the damping mode select switch to the "SPORT
2” position.
Push the "UP” button of the height select switch, then
check the operation sound of the AHC motor relay.

O T T
‘Zvv

The operation sound of the AHC motor relay should
be heard.

"UP” Button
Fo5738 OKés to step4.
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DI-246 DIAGNOSTICS - ACTIVEHEIGHT CONTROL SUSPENSION &
SKYHOOK TEMS

2Checkvoltage betweenterminal 1 of Engine RoomJ/B (for AHC motorrelay)and
body ground.

PREPARATION:
Remove the AHC motor relay from Engine Room J/B.
CHECK:
Measure voltage betweenterminal 1 of Engine Room J/B (for
AHC motor relay) and body ground.
OK:

Voltage: 10 - 14V

Fo5731 NG> bck and repair harness or connector.

@

3 | Check AHC motor relay.

PREPARATION:
Remove the AHC motor relay from Engine Room J/B.
2—"—1) CHECK:
Check continuity between each pair of terminal of motor relay.
OK:
Terminal Continuity
erminals 3 and 4 (Referencevalue62 Q)
Terminals 1 and2 Open
CHECK:
(@) Apply battery voltage between terminals 3 and 4.
Q 1 (b) Check continuity betweenterminals 1 and 2.
Qy .
> OK:
w | Terminals 1 and2 | Continuity
I
o |=HC
) 4 |3
BE 1840 B (+)

R15257

R15258

F00044
NG> Replace AHC motor relay.
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DIAGNOSTICS - ACTIVE HEIGHT CONTROL SUSPENSION & DI-247
SKYHOOK TEMS

4 | Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between AHC motor
relay and pump & motor, suspension control ECU (See page IN-35).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
~_—

Clear the DTC (See page DI-208).
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